src/scripts/Russian/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012, 2014, 2020  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source rus_roman.foma

define MapRomanNumeral 
RusRomanMapping -> || .#. _ .#. ; 


define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define PlusOrMinus %+|%-;
define Number [(PlusOrMinus) [%0|[NZDigit Digit^<15]] (%%|%°)] | RusRomanNumeral;
define RB (%%|%°) .#. ; 

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> тысяч || Digit _ Digit^3 RB;

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> миллионов || Digit _ Digit^3 тысяч;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> миллиардов || Digit _ Digit^3 миллионов;

define InsertTrillions 
[..] -> триллионов || Digit _ Digit^3 миллиардов;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [тысяч|миллионов|миллиардов|триллионов] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:один|2:два|3:три|4:четыре|5:пять|6:шесть|7:семь|8:восемь|9:девять;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:десять|1:одиннадцать|2:двенадцать|3:тринадцать|4:четырнадцать|5:пятнадцать|6:шестнадцать|7:семнадцать|8:восемнадцать|9:девятнадцать];

define Tens %0:0|2:двадцать|3:тридцать|4:сорок|5:пятьдесят|6:шестьдесят|7:семьдесят|8:восемьдесят|9:девяносто;

define Hundreds %0:0|1:сто|2:двести|3:триста|4:четыреста|5:пятьсот|6:шестьсот|7:семьсот|8:восемьсот|9:девятьсот;

define UpToThousand %0:ноль .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @-> ,, 
%+ @-> плюс ,, 
%- @-> минус ,, 
%% @-> процентов ,, 
%° -> градусов ; 

define FixCase 
тысяч:тысяча|миллионов:миллион|миллиардов:миллиард|триллионов:триллион|процентов:процент|градусов:градус -> || один _ ,, 
тысяч:тысячи|миллионов:миллиона|миллиардов:миллиарда|триллионов:триллиона|процентов:процента|градусов:градуса -> || два|три|четыре _ ; 

define FixGender 
один -> одна || _ тысяча ,, 
два -> две || _ тысячи ; 

regex 
Number .o. 
MapRomanNumeral .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
InsertTrillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
FixGender;
